West Virginia, session 2025, HB2325.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 9. Authorization for miscellaneous boards and agencies to promulgate legislative rules. §64-9-1. Board of Respiratory Care. The legislative rule filed in the State Register on February 27, 2024, authorized under the authority of §30-1-23 of this code, modified by the Board of Respiratory Care to meet the objections of the Legislative Rule-Making Review Committee and refiled in the State Register on September 9, 2024, relating to the Board of Respiratory Care (consideration of prior criminal convictions in initial licensure determinations, 30 CSR 10), is authorized.